Illinois, session 104th, HB2396.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Criminal Justice Information Act 5is amended by changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3930/7)  (from Ch. 38, par. 210-7)7    Sec. 7. Powers and duties. The Authority shall have the 8following powers, duties, and responsibilities:9        (a) To develop and operate comprehensive information 10    systems for the improvement and coordination of all 11    aspects of law enforcement, prosecution, and corrections;12        (b) To define, develop, evaluate, and correlate State 13    and local programs and projects associated with the 14    improvement of law enforcement and the administration of 15    criminal justice;16        (c) To act as a central repository and clearing house 17    for federal, state, and local research studies, plans, 18    projects, proposals, and other information relating to all 19    aspects of criminal justice system improvement and to 20    encourage educational programs for citizen support of 21    State and local efforts to make such improvements;22        (d) To undertake research studies to aid in 23    accomplishing its purposes;  HB2396- 2 -LRB104 10009 SPS 20080 b1        (e) To monitor the operation of existing criminal 2    justice information systems in order to protect the 3    constitutional rights and privacy of individuals about 4    whom criminal history record information has been 5    collected;6        (f) To provide an effective administrative forum for 7    the protection of the rights of individuals concerning 8    criminal history record information;9        (g) To issue regulations, guidelines, and procedures 10    which ensure the privacy and security of criminal history 11    record information consistent with State and federal laws;12        (h) To act as the sole administrative appeal body in 13    the State of Illinois to conduct hearings and make final 14    determinations concerning individual challenges to the 15    completeness and accuracy of criminal history record 16    information;17        (i) To act as the sole, official, criminal justice 18    body in the State of Illinois to conduct annual and 19    periodic audits of the procedures, policies, and practices 20    of the State central repositories for criminal history 21    record information to verify compliance with federal and 22    state laws and regulations governing such information;23        (j) To advise the Authority's Statistical Analysis 24    Center;25        (k) To apply for, receive, establish priorities for, 26    allocate, disburse, and spend grants of funds that are   HB2396- 3 -LRB104 10009 SPS 20080 b1    made available by and received on or after January 1, 1983 2    from private sources or from the United States pursuant to 3    the federal Crime Control Act of 1973, as amended, and 4    similar federal legislation, and to enter into agreements 5    with the United States government to further the purposes 6    of this Act, or as may be required as a condition of 7    obtaining federal funds;8        (l) To receive, expend, and account for such funds of 9    the State of Illinois as may be made available to further 10    the purposes of this Act;11        (m) To enter into contracts and to cooperate with 12    units of general local government or combinations of such 13    units, State agencies, and criminal justice system 14    agencies of other states for the purpose of carrying out 15    the duties of the Authority imposed by this Act or by the 16    federal Crime Control Act of 1973, as amended;17        (n) To enter into contracts and cooperate with units 18    of general local government outside of Illinois, other 19    states' agencies, and private organizations outside of 20    Illinois to provide computer software or design that has 21    been developed for the Illinois criminal justice system, 22    or to participate in the cooperative development or design 23    of new software or systems to be used by the Illinois 24    criminal justice system;25        (o) To establish general policies concerning criminal 26    justice information systems and to promulgate such rules,   HB2396- 4 -LRB104 10009 SPS 20080 b1    regulations, and procedures as are necessary to the 2    operation of the Authority and to the uniform 3    consideration of appeals and audits;4        (p) To advise and to make recommendations to the 5    Governor and the General Assembly on policies relating to 6    criminal justice information systems;7        (q) To direct all other agencies under the 8    jurisdiction of the Governor to provide whatever 9    assistance and information the Authority may lawfully 10    require to carry out its functions;11        (r) To exercise any other powers that are reasonable 12    and necessary to fulfill the responsibilities of the 13    Authority under this Act and to comply with the 14    requirements of applicable State or federal law or 15    regulation;16        (s) To exercise the rights, powers, and duties which 17    have been vested in the Authority by the Illinois Uniform 18    Conviction Information Act;19        (t) (Blank);20        (u) To exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested 21    in the Authority by the Illinois Public Safety Agency 22    Network Act;23        (v) To provide technical assistance in the form of 24    training to local governmental entities within Illinois 25    requesting such assistance for the purposes of procuring 26    grants for gang intervention and gang prevention programs   HB2396- 5 -LRB104 10009 SPS 20080 b1    or other criminal justice programs from the United States 2    Department of Justice; 3        (w) To conduct strategic planning and provide 4    technical assistance to implement comprehensive trauma 5    recovery services for violent crime victims in underserved 6    communities with high levels of violent crime, with the 7    goal of providing a safe, community-based, culturally 8    competent environment in which to access services 9    necessary to facilitate recovery from the effects of 10    chronic and repeat exposure to trauma. Services may 11    include, but are not limited to, behavioral health 12    treatment, financial recovery, family support and 13    relocation assistance, and support in navigating the legal 14    system; and15        (x) To coordinate statewide violence prevention 16    efforts and assist in the implementation of trauma 17    recovery centers and analyze trauma recovery services. The 18    Authority shall develop, publish, and facilitate the 19    implementation of a 4-year statewide violence prevention 20    plan, which shall incorporate public health, public 21    safety, victim services, and trauma recovery centers and 22    services; .23        (y) To use the services of, and enter into necessary 24    agreements having a term of up to 2 years with, outside 25    entities for the purpose of evaluating grant applications 26    and for the purpose of administering or monitoring   HB2396- 6 -LRB104 10009 SPS 20080 b1    compliance with grant agreements;2        (z) To make grants to community-based organizations, 3    local government agencies, non-profit organizations, or 4    other eligible entities for criminal justice and public 5    safety programs, including, but not limited to, violence 6    prevention and intervention, reentry after incarceration, 7    youth development and mentorship, economic development, 8    and civil legal aid; and9        (aa) To adopt rules necessary to carry out the 10    Authority's responsibilities under this Act.11    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 12shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 13by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act, and 14filing such additional copies with the State Government Report 15Distribution Center for the General Assembly as is required 16under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State Library Act.17(Source: P.A. 103-798, eff. 1-1-25.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.